Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 9. University of Wyoming Endowment Fund

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 116, § 2, as amended by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 2, appropriates $18,000,000 from the general fund to the state treasurer for deposit into the university endowment challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-903

, to be expended as prescribed under W.S.

21-16-901

through

21-16-904

.

§ 21-16-901.
University of Wyoming endowment challenge program.

The University of Wyoming endowment challenge program is created.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 197, § 1.

§ 21-16-902.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Challenge account” means the university endowment challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-903

;

“Permanent endowment funds managed by the University of Wyoming foundation” means the endowment funds that are invested by the University of Wyoming foundation on a permanent basis and regarding which earnings on those investments are dedicated to be expended exclusively to benefit and promote the mission, operation or any program or activity of the University of Wyoming, including but not limited to professorships and student scholarships, increases to the corpus of the endowment and defraying reasonable costs of endowment administration;

“Substantial endowment gift” means an irrevocable gift or transfer to the University of Wyoming foundation of money or other property by a donor where:

The gift or the foundation’s interest in the property is conditioned on it being used by the foundation exclusively for endowment purposes;

Except as provided by W.S. 21-16-904(a)(ix) for fallen heroes endowments, the gift or property transferred has a fair market value of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00); and

The following apply:

The gift was received or the transfer occurred on or after March 1, 2001. Payments are not eligible to be matched if they are part of a gift for which some payment was received prior to March 1, 2001;

If a commitment to make the gift or transfer is made in writing to the university foundation on or after March 1, 2001, to qualify for the match, the gift shall actually be received or the transfer shall actually occur not later than December 31 of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made to the university foundation;

Members of a single family may aggregate their individual gifts to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for matching funds. Gifts from nonfamily members in memory of a deceased individual may also be aggregated to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for matching funds.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 197, § 1; 2004, ch. 116, § 1; 2006, ch. 70, § 2; 2009, ch. 52, § 1, ch. 209, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(iii)(C)(I), substituted “2006” for “2005”; in (a)(iii)(C)(II), substituted “2006” for “2005,” and “2011” for “2010.”

The 2006 amendment,

in (a)(iii)(C), substituted “2009” for “2006” in (I) and (II), substituted “2014” for “2011,” added (III), and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 4(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws, 2009, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(iii)(C)(I), substituted “on or after March 1, 2001” for “during the donation period March 1, 2001, through December 31, 2009,” substituted “March 1, 2001” for “the donation period” at the end, and deleted “made during the donation period” following “Payments”; and in (a)(iii)(C)(II), substituted “on or after March 1, 2001” for “during the donation period March 1, 2001, through December 31, 2009” and “December 31 of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made to the university foundation” for “the end of the five (5) year collection period ending December 31, 2014.”

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 1, in (a)(iii)(B), added “Except as provided by W.S. 21 16 904(a)(ix) for fallen heroes endowments,” at the beginning.

Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2009.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-16-903.
University endowment challenge account.

The university endowment challenge account is created.

The state treasurer shall invest amounts deposited within the account in accordance with law, and all investment earnings shall be credited to the general fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) or

9-4-207

, other funds within the account shall not lapse or revert until directed by the legislature and shall remain available for distribution as provided in this article.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 197, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “ within the earmarked revenue fund” from the end of (a).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence of (b).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 116, § 2, as amended by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 2, appropriates $18,000,000 from the general fund to the state treasurer for deposit into the university endowment challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-903

, to be expended as prescribed under W.S.

21-16-901

through

21-16-904

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 21-16-904.
Endowment challenge fund matching fund program; matching payments; agreements with university foundation; annual reports; reversions of appropriations; legislative oversight.

The state treasurer shall administer the matching fund program established under this section. The following shall apply to the program:

To the extent that funds are available in the challenge account, the state treasurer shall match each substantial endowment gift actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation by transferring from the challenge account to the university an amount equal to the amount of the substantial endowment gift. Prior to the receipt of any substantial endowment gift, the donor shall be notified by the foundation that there may or may not be any state matching funds available for the gift. If funds are not available within the account, the amount of substantial endowment gifts to the foundation may be accumulated until such time as matching funds become available. Endowment gifts made directly to the university shall be endowment gifts to the foundation for purposes of this section. The university shall manage both the endowment gifts and the matching funds in the same manner as other endowment funds, but otherwise subject to the provisions of this section;

The state treasurer shall make transfers to the university under this section not later than the end of the calendar quarter following the quarter during which the gift is received. Matching funds shall only be available for expenditure to the extent cash or cash equivalent contributions are actually received by the University of Wyoming. Where a gift is made through a series of payments or transfers, except as provided in paragraph (ix) of this subsection, no matching funds shall be transferred by the state treasurer until the total value of all payments or transfers actually received toward the gift totals at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00). Thereafter, matching funds shall be transferred as payments or transfers toward that gift are received by the foundation. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits the university foundation from accumulating substantial endowment gifts until such time as state matching funds become available;

The university shall immediately transfer all matching funds received to the university foundation to be permanently invested. The university shall enter into a new agreement or modify its existing agreement with the University of Wyoming foundation under which the foundation shall manage the matching funds it receives in the same manner as other permanent endowment funds managed by the University of Wyoming foundation subject to the provisions of this section. Expenditures may be made from that portion of the funds attributable to endowment gifts received in accordance with the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act. Notwithstanding that act, only the earnings from the investment of state matching funds may be expended for purposes other than reasonable costs of administration. All expenditures shall be used exclusively for the purposes of the endowment, including reasonable costs of administration. Earnings also may be reinvested to increase the balance of the corpus. Reasonable costs of administration shall not exceed an annual rate of one percent (1%) of the fair value of each state matching fund account held by the foundation that is associated with a substantial endowment gift received by the foundation under W.S. 21-16-902(a)(iii). The costs of administration shall be assessed quarterly at one-fourth (1/4) the annual rate as specified in this subsection or as otherwise specified by law. The fair value of each state matching fund account held by the foundation shall be determined by the foundation as of the last day of the preceding quarter. Any modification of costs of administration allowed shall be effected through a footnote to the University of Wyoming’s general appropriation in the general government appropriations bill or in a 300 section of the general government appropriations bill. Upon the modification of any costs of administration to an amount above one percent (1%), the University of Wyoming foundation shall submit to the joint appropriations interim committee a detailed financial accounting of all costs of administration incurred during the fiscal year;

The state treasurer shall distribute funds or encumber funds for future distribution in the case of a written commitment, to match a substantial endowment gift based on the order in which each substantial endowment gift is actually received or in which a written commitment to make a substantial endowment gift is received by the foundation. Matching funds shall not be distributed or encumbered in excess of the amount in the challenge account. In no event shall matching funds be transferred to the university except to match substantial endowment gifts actually received or to match gifts actually received and accumulated. The state treasurer shall rescind an encumbrance if the university notifies him that a donor who made a commitment will not make a substantial endowment gift that qualifies for matching funds under this section;

If the president of the university determines that the purpose of a substantial endowment gift to the foundation is not consistent with mission or capability of the university, the gift shall not qualify for the matching program under this section;

For the purpose of calculating the matching amount only, the state treasurer shall use the value of a substantial endowment gift based on its fair market value at the time the gift is received by the university foundation. The university shall provide evidence of fair market value as the state treasurer requires for each substantial endowment gift. The state treasurer’s office shall not bear any costs associated with providing evidence;

The University of Wyoming shall on or before October 1 of each year submit a report to the state treasurer from the foundation regarding the endowment matching program established under this section for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a financial summary and a review of the accomplishments resulting from endowment program expenditures. The state treasurer shall distribute the report to the governor and the legislature;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 3.

To the extent funds are available in the challenge account, the state treasurer shall distribute matching funds not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each fallen heroes endowment as follows:

Two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) for the first one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) actually received in a fallen heroes endowment; and

Three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) for an additional one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) received in a fallen heroes endowment, excluding any funds deposited in a fallen heroes endowment pursuant to this paragraph.

Any funds appropriated to a university endowment fund by the legislature shall be credited to the university fund endowment challenge account under W.S.

21-16-903

.

Nothing in this section obligates the legislature to match accumulated substantial endowment gifts as authorized under subsection (a) of this section. The legislature reserves the right to modify or terminate the matching program at any time.

As used in this section “earnings from the investment of state matching funds” means that amount of net appreciation, realized and unrealized, in the fair value of assets of the endowment fund attributable to all state matching funds which exceeds the total amount of those state matching funds when distributed by the state treasurer to the university.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 197, § 1; 2004, ch. 116, § 1; 2006, ch. 70, § 2; 2009, ch. 52, §§ 1, 3, ch. 209, § 1; 2010, ch. 28, § 1; 2014 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2014, ch. 3, section 2, provides: “The University of Wyoming shall report to the joint judiciary interim committee no later than October 15, 2014 on the creation of a stabilization reserve account for the endowment gifts and matching state funds managed under
W.S.

21-16-904

.”

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), substituted “by the legislature” for “in 2001 House Bill 0001 (general government appropriations) or 2001 Senate File 0001 (general government appropriations), as may be enacted into law” in the first sentence and “2011” for “2010” in the last sentence, and inserted “2001 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 139, Section 067, Footnote 2 or” following “Notwithstanding” in the last sentence.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “2014” for “2011” in (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 4(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. ch. 52, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(vii), deleted “Through the end of the collection period” and made stylistic change; repealed former (a)(viii), which read: “Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the collection period shall revert to the general fund.”; and deleted the former last sentence of (b) which read: “Notwithstanding 2001 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 139, Section 067, Footnote 2 or any other provision of law, any unexpended funds from this account shall revert to the general fund on December 31, 2014.”

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 1, in (a)(ii), inserted “, except as provided in paragraph (ix) of this subsection,” in the second sentence; and added (a)(ix).

Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2009.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both laws have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted the present second and third sentences in (a)(i); added the last sentence of (a)(ii); inserted “or to match gifts actually received and accumulated” in (a)(iv); and added (c).

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, in the second sentence of (a)(iii), added “subject to the provisions of this section” to the end; added the third sentence of (a)(iii); in the fourth sentence of (a)(iii), added “Notwithstanding that act”, substituted “state matching” for “these”, added “for purposes other than reasonable costs of administration”; in the fifth sentence of (a)(iii), substituted “All expenditures shall be used” for “These earnings shall be expended”, deleted “increasing the balance in the corpus and for”; added the last sentence of (a)(iii); and added (d).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, added the fifth through ninth sentences in (a)(iii).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii), inserted the second sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 116, § 2, as amended by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 2, appropriates $18,000,000 from the general fund to the state treasurer for deposit into the university endowment challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-903

, to be expended as prescribed under W.S.

21-16-901

through

21-16-904

.